Connecticut, session 2026, SB00451.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) There is established an
advisory council on chimeric antigen receptor T-cell therapy and other
gene therapies. The council shall advise and make recommendations to
the Department of Public Health and other state agencies, as
appropriate, regarding (1) the availability of chimeric antigen receptor
T-cell therapy and other gene therapies in the state for the treatment of
cancer, (2) safe, equitable and financially sustainable delivery of such
therapies, (3) advanced training for clinical providers of such therapies,
(4) long-term follow-up and vector safety for patients receiving such
therapies, (5) the development of referral and management protocols for
such therapies, (6) education for clinicians, patients and patients'
relatives and caregivers regarding such therapies and such protocols, (7)
advising patients and their relatives and caregivers regarding the cost
and availability of insurance coverage for such therapies, (8)
SB451 / File No. 566 1

SB451 File No. 566
opportunities for coordinating with research collaborations,
government agencies, including, but not limited to, the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services, accrediting bodies and national
registries regarding such therapies, (9) the development of centers of
excellence in the state for the delivery of such therapies, including, but
not limited to, requiring accreditation of such centers, (10) the
development of a state-wide referral network to ensure all eligible
patients are matched with a center of excellence in the state, (11) the
development of safety protocols to address complications experienced
by patients receiving such therapies and other safety concerns, (12)
methods of providing psychosocial support to patients receiving such
therapies and their relatives and caregivers, and (13) methods of
tracking patient outcomes with a focus on equity as it relates to
diagnosis, race, ethnicity, geography and income.
(b) The council may perform the following functions:
(1) Consult with experts on chimeric antigen receptor T-cell therapy
and other gene therapies for the treatment of cancer to develop policy
recommendations for improving patient access to such therapies in the
state;
(2) Hold public hearings and otherwise make inquiries of and solicit
comments from the general public to assist with a study or survey of
persons living with cancer who have received such therapies, such
persons' caregivers and health care providers and patient advocates;
and
(3) Research and make recommendations to the Department of Public
Health and other state agencies.
(c) The council shall consist of the following members:
(1) The Commissioner of Public Health, or the commissioner's
designee;
(2) The Insurance Commissioner, or the commissioner's designee,
who may be the representative of a health carrier;
SB451 / File No. 566 2

SB451 File No. 566
(3) The Commissioner of Social Services, or the commissioner's
designee;
(4) The health information technology officer, designated in
accordance with section 19a-754a of the general statutes, or the officer's
designee;
(5) The chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public health, or their designees;
(6) The chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to human services, or their designees;
(7) Four appointed by the Senate chairperson of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public health, one of whom shall be a hematologist or
oncologist providing services to adults, one of whom shall be a specialist
in emerging cellular and genetic therapy, one of whom shall be an
expert in pharmacology and one of whom shall be an advocate for
patients with a condition that is treated by gene therapy;
(8) Four appointed by the House chairperson of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public health, one of whom shall be a patient who has
received chimeric antigen receptor T-cell therapy, one of whom shall be
a representative of an association of hospitals in the state, one of whom
shall be a pediatric hematologist or oncologist and one of whom shall be
a community health equity advocate;
(9) Four appointed by the Senate ranking member of the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to public health, one of whom shall be a representative
of an internationally recognized accreditation body for institutions
providing cellular therapies, one of whom shall be a representative of
an association of health carriers in the state, one of whom shall be the
SB451 / File No. 566 3

SB451 File No. 566
director of a cellular therapy program in the state and one of whom shall
be a representative of the life sciences or biotechnology industry; and
(10) Four appointed by the House ranking member of the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to public health, one of whom shall be a representative,
family member or caregiver of a person living with cancer who has
received gene therapy, one of whom shall be an advocate for cancer
patients in the state, one of whom shall be a social worker or patient
navigator and one of whom shall be a director of a transplant and
cellular therapy program in the state.
(d) All initial appointments to the council shall be made not later than
October 31, 2026. Except for members of the council who represent state
agencies, members shall serve for a term of three years and any vacancy
shall be filled by the appointing authority. The members shall receive
no compensation for their services but may be reimbursed for any
necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The
Commissioner of Public Health shall select an acting chairperson of the
council from its members for the purpose of organizing the first council
meeting. Such chairperson shall schedule and convene the first meeting,
which shall be held not later than November 30, 2026. The members of
the council shall appoint, by majority vote, a chairperson and vice-
chairperson during the first meeting of the council. Thereafter, the
council shall meet not less than quarterly in person or on a remote
100 platform, as determined by the chairperson.
101 (e) The council shall be within the Department of Public Health for
102 administrative purposes only.
103 (f) Not later than one year after the date of its first meeting, and
104 annually thereafter, the council shall report, in accordance with the
105 provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
106 committees of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
107 relating to public health and insurance regarding its findings and
108 recommendations, including, but not limited to, (1) the council's
109 activities, research findings and any recommendations for proposed
SB451 / File No. 566 4

SB451 File No. 566
110 legislative changes, and (2) any potential sources of funding for the
111 council's activities, including, but not limited to, grants, donations,
112 sponsorships or in-kind donations.
113 (g) The council may (1) apply for and accept grants, gifts, bequests,
114 sponsorships and in-kind donations of funds from federal and interstate
115 agencies, private firms, individuals and foundations for the purpose of
116 carrying out its responsibilities, and (2) enter into any contracts or
117 agreements, in accordance with any established procedures, as may be
118 necessary for the distribution or use of any received funds, services or
119 property in accordance with any requirements to fulfill any conditions
120 of a grant, gift, bequest, sponsorship or in-kind donation.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
PH Joint Favorable
SB451 / File No. 566 5

SB451 File No. 566
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Public Health, Dept. GF - Potential Minimal Minimal
Cost
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill establishes an advisory council on chimeric antigen receptor
(CAR) T-cell therapy and other gene therapies within the Department
of Public Health (DPH) for administrative purposes only. The bill
results in a minimal potential cost to DPH beginning in FY 27, as council
members may be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in
performing their duties.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
SB451 / File No. 566 6

SB451 File No. 566
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 451
AN ACT ESTABLISHING AN ADVISORY COUNCIL ON CHIMERIC
ANTIGEN RECEPTOR T-CELL THERAPY AND OTHER GENE
THERAPIES.